Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Out of State Marriages

402.040.
Marriage in another state.

If any resident of this state marries in another state, the marriage shall be valid here if valid in the state where solemnized, unless the marriage is against Kentucky public policy.

A marriage between members of the same sex is against Kentucky public policy and shall be subject to the prohibitions established in KRS

402.045

.

History.

2101; 1998, ch. 258, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes

On June 26, 2015, the United States Supreme Court in Obergefell v. Hodges, 192 L. Ed. 2d 609, held that the Fourteenth Amendment requires a State to license a marriage between two people of the same sex and to recognize a marriage between two people of the same sex when their marriage was lawfully licensed and performed out-of-State.

402.045.
Same-sex marriage in another jurisdiction void and unenforceable.

A marriage between members of the same sex which occurs in another jurisdiction shall be void in Kentucky.

Any rights granted by virtue of the marriage, or its termination, shall be unenforceable in Kentucky courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes

On June 26, 2015, the United States Supreme Court in Obergefell v. Hodges, 192 L. Ed. 2d 609, held that the Fourteenth Amendment requires a State to license a marriage between two people of the same sex and to recognize a marriage between two people of the same sex when their marriage was lawfully licensed and performed out-of-State.